Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.460

Reserve officers—Board of trustees.

A municipality that adopts appropriate legislation extending the relief provisions of this chapter to its reserve officers shall create a reserve officer board of trustees to administer this chapter composed as follows:

(1) A county reserve officer board of trustees shall consist of the following five members: (a) Two members of the county legislative authority and the county auditor, or their designees; (b) the sheriff; and (c) one reserve officer who is elected by reserve officers of the county for an annual one-year term.

(2) Any other reserve officer board of trustees shall consist of the following five members: (a) The mayor, if one exists for the municipality, and one member of the municipality's legislative authority, or two members of the municipality's legislative authority if a mayor does not exist for the municipality, or their designees; (b) the clerk, comptroller, or chief fiscal officer of the municipality; (c) the head of the law enforcement agency; and (d) one reserve officer who is elected by reserve officers of the municipality for an annual term of one year.

(3) The secretary of the board of trustees shall keep a public record of all proceedings and of all receipts and disbursements made by the board of trustees, shall make an annual report of its expenses and disbursements with a full list of the beneficiaries of the principal fund in the municipality, and shall make all required reports to the state board. The state board shall provide the boards of trustees with all necessary forms.

[ 1999 c 148 s 33; 1998 c 307 s 2.]